Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-38,107
Sections; applicability.

Sections 30-38,102 to 30-38,106 apply to all trusts whether established pursuant to Nebraska law or established pursuant to the law of another state or jurisdiction.

Laws 2000, LB 1197, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 30-3706;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 107.